Hawaii statutes.
§286-47 Certificate of registration;
certificate of ownership; containers. Upon the registration of a vehicle,
the director of finance shall issue a certificate of registration to the owner
and a certificate of ownership to the legal owner, or to a dealer who shall be
a person licensed to sell new motor vehicles under chapter 437 which
certificates shall meet the following requirements:

(1) Both the certificate of registration and the
certificate of ownership shall contain upon the face thereof, the date issued,
the registration number assigned to the owner and to the vehicle, the name and
address of the owner and legal owner in typewriting, also such description of
the registered vehicle as may be determined by the director of finance. If any
of the information subsequently proves to be a typographical error, the dealer,
as defined in section 437-1.1, shall notify the director of finance of the
error by a written certificate stating the reasons for and nature of the error
and the correction which should be made in the certificate of registration and
the certificate of ownership. Upon receipt of the dealer's certificate by the
director of finance, the certificate of registration and the certificate of
ownership shall be corrected accordingly so long as the correction does not
constitute a change of the vehicle originally registered. A fee shall be paid
to the director of finance for each instance of correction of the registration
records. The fee charged for each instance of correction of the registration
records shall be established by the county's legislative body;

(2) In addition to the requirements provided for in
paragraph (1) above, the face of the certificate of ownership shall contain
endorsement lines for the transfer of title or interest of the registered owner
and legal owner, and the odometer reading of the vehicle on the date of
transfer. The reverse side of the certificate of ownership shall contain the
application for registration by the transferee;

(3) (A) Every owner shall keep the certificate of
registration within the vehicle for which it is registered and shall present
the same at the request of a police officer, or in the event the vehicle is a
motorcycle, shall carry such certificate in a convenient receptacle attached to
the vehicle and which shall be presented at the request of a police officer;

(B) This shall not apply to state or county
vehicles readily identified by the license plates and markings on sides of such
vehicles;

(C) This shall not apply to commercial
vehicles defined as rental motor vehicles, or cars shipped by licensed car
dealerships or repossession companies. These businesses may keep a duplicate
copy of the certificate of registration within the vehicle for which it is
registered, in which case the certificate of registration shall be available
for inspection at their principal place of business within the State; and

(D) This requirement to carry the certificate
of registration with the vehicle shall not apply when such certificate is
removed from the vehicle for the purpose of application for renewal, transfer
of registration, or to record a change in the registration. [L 1929, c 197,
§§6, 13; RL 1935, §2669; RL 1945, §7340; am L 1949, c 166, §1; am L 1953, c
131, §1(a), (b); RL 1955, §160-7; HRS §286-47; am L 1970, c 73, §1(a); am L
1972, c 159, §1; am L 1980, c 141, §1; am L 1981, c 44, §1 and c 82, §18; am L
1998, c 95, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next